Alaska statutes. Title 34. Property.
Article 4. Improvement of Chattels.

Sec. 34.35.175.
Improvement lien on personal property.

A person who makes, alters, repairs, or labors upon an article of personal property at the request of the owner or lawful possessor has a lien on the property for the just and reasonable charges for the labor performed and material furnished. The person may keep possession of the article until the charges are paid.

If the charges are not paid within three months after the labor or materials, or both, are performed or furnished, the person having the lien may sell the article at public auction and apply the proceeds of the sale, first, to the payment of the expenses of sale, second, to the discharge of lien, and third, the balance to the owner of the article.

The sale shall be held in the recording district where the article is left to be altered or repaired.

Before the sale is made, notice of the sale shall be given to the debtor by registered letter directed to the last known place of residence of the debtor, if the residence is known, and also by posting notice of the sale in three public places in the recording district for 10 days before the day of sale. The notice must contain a particular description of the article to be sold, the name of the owner or reputed owner, the amount due on the lien, and the time and place of the sale.

History.

(§ 26-3-1 ACLA 1949; am § 2 ch 4 SLA 2012)

Sec. 34.35.180.
Chattel lien; surrender of possession.

A person who expends labor, skill, or materials upon a chattel, at the request of its owner, reputed owner, or authorized agent of the owner, or lawful possessor of the chattel, has a lien upon the chattel for the contract price of the expenditure, or in the absence of a contract price, for the reasonable worth of the expenditure, for a period of six months from the expenditure, notwithstanding the fact that the possession of the chattel is surrendered to the owner or lawful possessor.

History.

(§ 26-3-2 ACLA 1949)

Sec. 34.35.185.
Lien notice.

The lien claimant shall, before delivery of the chattel to the owner or the authorized agent of the owner, record a lien notice in the office of the recorder of the recording district where the chattel is situated and in which the labor, skill, and materials are expended on the chattel.

The notice must state the name of the claimant, the name of the owner, or reputed owner, a description of the chattel, sufficient for identification, upon which the claimant has expended labor, skill, and material, the amount for which the lien is claimed, and the date upon which the expenditure was completed. The notice shall be verified by the oath of the claimant, or by some one on behalf of the claimant, who has personal knowledge of the facts, and may be substantially in the following form:

, Claimant, v. Defendant Notice is hereby given that claims a lien upon (describe the property) for, and on account of labor, skill, and materials expended upon the (property); that the name of the owner, or reputed owner is, ; that the labor, skill, and materials were expended upon the property between the day of , and the day of , and the rendition of the labor, skill, and materials so expended by the claimant above named was closed on the day of ; that the amount claimant demands for labor, skill, and materials so expended is $; that no part of it has been paid except $, and there is now due and remaining unpaid on it, after deducting all just credits and offsets, the sum of $, in which amount a lien is claimed upon the property. State of Alaska Judicial District
ss: Claimant I,, being first duly sworn, on oath say that I am named in the foregoing claim; that I have heard the claim read, know the contents of it, and believe it is true. Claimant Subscribed and sworn to before me this day of Name of Officer taking oath

Click to view

History.

(§ 26-3-3 ACLA 1949)

Revisor’s notes. —

Minor word changes related to the recording of documents were made in subsection (a) of this section in 1988 under sec. 42, ch. 161, SLA 1988.

Sec. 34.35.190.
Duty of recorder.

Upon the presentation of the notice to the recorder, the recorder shall record the notice and index it in a book or computer-readable medium kept for that purpose and called “Index of Liens upon Chattels.” The recorder is entitled to charge and receive from the person recording the notice of lien a fee provided for recording and indexing chattel mortgages.

History.

(§ 26-3-4 ACLA 1949; am § 39 ch 30 SLA 1996)

Revisor’s notes. —

Minor word changes related to the recording of documents were made in this section in 1988 because of the enactment of ch. 161, SLA 1988.

Sec. 34.35.195.
Persons considered owner of chattel.

The following persons are considered the owner of a chattel, or the authorized agent of the owner, for the purpose of AS

34.35.175

—

34.35.215

:

a person in possession of the chattel under an agreement to purchase it, whether the title to it is in the person or the vendor;

a person in lawful possession of the chattel.

History.

(§ 26-3-5 ACLA 1949)

Sec. 34.35.200.
Priority.

A lien under AS

34.35.180

, when recorded in accordance with AS

34.35.185

, is superior to and preferred to

a lien, mortgage, or encumbrance that attaches to the chattel after the starting of labor or services or the furnishing of the material mentioned in that section;

a lien, mortgage, or other encumbrance that attaches before that time, when the person furnishing the material or performing the services did not have notice of the prior lien, mortgage, or encumbrance, or the prior lien, mortgage, or encumbrance was not recorded or filed in the manner provided by law.

History.

(§ 26-3-5 ACLA 1949; am § 30 ch 71 SLA 1972)

Revisor’s notes. —

Minor word changes related to the recording of documents were made in this section in 1988 because of the enactment of ch. 161, SLA 1988.

Sec. 34.35.205.
Duration of lien.

A lien does not bind a property for more than six months after the lien is recorded, unless suit is brought in the superior court to enforce the lien within that time, or if credit is given, within six months after the expiration of the credit.

A lien may not be continued in force for more than one year from stopping of work or services, or after the material is furnished, by an agreement of the parties.

The practice and procedure to enforce a lien shall be governed by the law applicable to the foreclosure of mechanics’ and materialmen’s liens.

History.

(§ 26-3-6 ACLA 1949)

Revisor’s notes. —

Minor word changes related to the recording of documents were made in subsection (a) in 1988 because of the enactment of ch. 161, SLA 1988.

Sec. 34.35.210.
Release or discharge of lien.

A lien under AS

34.35.175

—

34.35.215

may be released and discharged by the lien claimant or the agent of the lien claimant by an entry upon the “Index of Liens upon Chattels.”

History.

(§ 26-3-7 ACLA 1949)

Sec. 34.35.215.
Penalty for refusal to discharge lien.

A person who refuses to discharge a lien after the lien is paid is guilty of a misdemeanor, and upon conviction is punishable by a fine of not more than $500 and in addition is liable in damages to the person injured by the refusal in an amount equal to three times the damage sustained.

History.

(§ 26-3-7 ACLA 1949)